nl: Materiaal draad/touw: Aluminium; Messing; Koper; Gegalvaniseerd metaal; Gold; Nikkel; Vernikkeld; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropyleen (PP); Silver; Verzilverd; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Vinyl; Zink; Andere
sk-SK: Materiál drôtu/lana: Hliník; Mosadz; Meď; Pozinkovaná oceľ; Zlato; Nikel; Poniklovaný; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylén (PP); Strieborný; Postriebrený; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Vinyl; Zinok; Iné
da: Wire-/rebmateriale: Aluminum; Messing; Kobber; Galvaniseret stål; Guld; Nikkel; Forniklet; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Sølv; Forsølvet; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Vinyl; Zink; Andet
pl: Materiał drutu/sznura: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Miedź; Stal cynkowana; Złota; Nikiel; Niklowany; Nylon; Poliester; Polipropylen (PP); Srebrna; Posrebrzany; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Winyl; Cynk; Inne
vi: Vật liệu dây/dây thừng: Nhôm; Đồng; Màu đồng đỏ; Thép mạ kẽm; Vàng; Niken; Mạ niken; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Trắng; Mạ bạc; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Nhựa vinyl; Kẽm; Khác
sv: Tråd/rep - material: Aluminium; Mässing; Koppar; Galvaniserat stål; Gyllene; Nickel; Nickelpläterad; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropen (PP); Silver; Silverpläterad; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Vinyl; Zink; Övrigt
ru: Материал проволоки/троса: Алюминий; Латунь; Медь; Оцинкованная сталь; Золото; Никель; Никелированный; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Полипропилен (ПП); Серебро; Серебрение; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Винил; Цинк; Другое
es: Material del alambre/cuerda: Aluminio; Latón; Cobre; Acero galvanizado; Dorado; Níquel; Niquelado; Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Plateado; Plateado; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Vinilo; Zinc; Otros
el: Υλικό σύρματος/σχοινιού: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Χαλκός; Γαλβανισμένος χάλυβας; Χρυσό; Νικέλιο; Επινικελωμένο; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Ασήμι; Επάργυρο; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Βινύλιο; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
fi: Vaijerin/köyden materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Kupari; Galvanoitu teräs; Kulta; Nikkeli; Nikkelipinnoitettu; Nailon; Polyesteri; Polypropeeni (PP); Hopea; Hopeoitu; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Vinyyli; Sinkki; Muu
zh-CN: 钢丝/绳索材质: 铝; 黄铜; 铜色; 镀锌钢; 金色; 镍; 镀镍; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 聚丙烯 (PP); 银色; 镀银; 不锈钢; 钢; 乙烯基贴纸; 锌; 其他
ja: ワイヤ/ロープ材質: アルミニウム; 真鍮; コッパー; 亜鉛メッキスチール; ゴールド; ニッケル; ニッケルメッキ; ナイロン; ポリエステル; ポリプロピレン (PP); シルバー; 銀メッキ; ステンレススチール; スチール; ビニール; 亜鉛; その他
ko: 와이어/로프 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 구리; 아연도금강; 금색; 니켈; 니켈 도금; 나일론; 폴리에스테르; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 은색; 은 도금; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 비닐; 아연; 기타
hu: Huzal/kötél anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Réz; Horganyzott acél; Arany; Nikkel; Nikkelezett; Nejlon; Poliészter; Polipropilén (PP); Ezüst; Ezüstözött; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Vinil; Cink; Egyéb
lt-LT: Vielos / lyno medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Varis; Galvanizuotas plienas; Auksinė; Nikelis; Nikeliuotas; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Polipropilenas (PP); Sidabrinė; Pasidabruotas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Vinilas; Cinkas; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal žice/užeta: Aluminij; Mjed; Bakar; Pocinčani čelik; Zlato; Nikal; Niklano; Najlon; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Srebro; Posrebreno; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Vinil; Cink; Ostalo
cs: Materiál drátu/lana: Hliník; Mosaz; Měděná; Galvanizovaná ocel; Zlatá; Nikl; Poniklované; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Stříbrná; Postříbřený; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Vinylové; Zinek; Jiné
ro-RO: Material sârmă/frânghie: Aluminiu; Alamă; Cupru; Otel galvanizat; Auriu; Nichel; Placat cu nichel; Nailon; Poliester; Polipropilenă (PP); Argint; Placat cu argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Vinil; Zinc; Altele
sl-SI: Material žice/vrvi: Aluminij; Medenina; Baker; Pocinkano jeklo; Zlato; Nikelj; Ponikljana; Najlon; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Srebro; Posrebrena; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Vinil; Cink; Drugo
pt-PT: Material da cabo/corda: Alumínio; Latão; Cobre; Aço galvanizado; Ouro; Níquel; Banhado a níquel; Náilon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Prata; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Vinil; Zinco; Outro
it: Materiale filo/corda: Alluminio; Ottone; Rame; Acciaio galvanizzato; Oro; Nickel; Placcato nickel; Nylon; Poliestere; Polipropilene (PP); Argento; Placcato argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Vinile; Zinco; Altro
en: Wire/Rope material: Aluminum; Brass; Copper; Galvanized steel; Gold; Nickel; Nickel-plated; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Silver; Silver-plated; Stainless steel; Steel; Vinyl; Zinc; Other
bg-BG: Материал тел/въже: Алуминий; Месинг; Мед; Поцинкована стомана; Злато; Никел; Никелирано покритие; Найлон; Полиестер; Полипропилен (PP); Сребро; Посребрено покритие; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Винил; Цинк; Други
de: Draht-/Seilmaterial: Aluminium; Messing; Kupfer; Galvanisierter Stahl; Gold; Nickel; Vernickelt; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Silber; Versilbert; Edelstahl; Stahl; Vinyl; Zink; Sonstiges
nb: Tråd-/taumateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Kobber; Galvanisert stål; Gull; Nikkel; Forniklet; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Sølv; Sølvforgylt; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Vinyl; Sink; Annet
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำลวด/เชือก: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; สีทองแดง; เหล็กกล้ากัลวาไนซ์; โกลด์; นิกเกิล; ชุบนิกเกิล; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); ซิลเวอร์; ชุบเงิน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; ไวนิล; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Material de fio/corda: Alumínio; Latão; Cobre; Aço galvanizado; Gold; Níquel; Banhado a níquel; Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Silver; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Vinil; Zinco; Outro
tr: Tel/Halat malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bakır; Galvanize çelik; Gold; Nikel; Nikel kaplama; Plastik; Poliyester; Polipropilen (PP); Silver; Gümüş kaplama; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Vinil; Çinko; Diğer
fr: Matériau du fil/câble: Aluminum; Laiton; Cuivre; Acier aluminisé; Or; Nickel; Plaqué nickel; Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylène (PP); Argent; Plaqué argent; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Vinyl; Zinc; Autre
zh-TW: 線/繩材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 紅銅色; 鍍鋅鋼; 金色; 鎳; 鍍鎳; 尼龍; 聚酯; 聚丙烯 (PP); 銀色; 鍍銀; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 乙烯基; 鋅; 其他